District of Columbia statutes.
2-1596

Membership.

(a)

The Commission shall include the:

(1)

Mayor, who shall serve as Chair;

(2)

Chairman of Council of the District of Columbia;

(3)

Chair of the Committee on Human Services;

(4)

Chief Judge, Family Court, Superior Court of the District of Columbia;

(5)

Deputy Mayor for Education;

(6)

City Administrator;

(7)

State Superintendent of Education;

(8)

Chancellor of the District of Columbia Public Schools;

(9)

Chair of the Public Charter School Board;

(10)

Director of the Department of Human Services;

(11)

Director of the Child and Family Services Agency;

(12)

Director of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services;

(13)

Director of the Department of Corrections;

(14)

Director of the Department of Health;

(15)

Director of the Department of Mental Health;

(16)

Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department;

(17)

Director of the Court Social Services Agency;

(18)

Attorney General for the District of Columbia;

(19)

Director of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council;

(20)

Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation;

(21)

Director of the District of Columbia Public Library;

(22)

Executive Director of the Children and Youth Investment Trust Corporation;

(23)

President of the State Board of Education; and

(24)

In consultation with youth service advocates and organizations throughout the community, 5 members from the community, appointed by the Mayor, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Mayor, by order, may appoint additional members to the Commission, as necessary.

(c)

(1)

The members of the community appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(24) of this section shall include:

(A)

A local funder of youth service and development activities;

(B)

A representative of the early childhood education community;

(C)

A representative of the youth service provider community;

(D)

A representative from the post-secondary preparedness community; and

(E)

An expert on primary and secondary education policy.

(2)

Members of the community appointed pursuant to subsection (a)(24) of this section may be rotated or changed based upon the agenda for each Commission meeting.

History

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 506, 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4061(e), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 25(b), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (a)(20), deleted “and” from the end; and added subsecs. (a)(22) to (24) and subsec. (c).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made punctuation correction.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made punctuation correction in (a)(21).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4061(e) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4061(e) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).